Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-250
Permanent school fund; sale of public lands; credit to state.

All money that may be received from the United States on account of the five percent fund on cash sale shall be placed to the credit of the permanent school fund of the state.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 30, p. 313;

R.S.1913, § 5872;

C.S.1922, § 5207;

C.S.1929, § 72-227;

R.S.1943, § 72-250.